Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201257-1412
Commission; powers.

The commission may
contract for professional services and expert assistance, including, but not
limited to, the services of engineers, hydrogeologists, accountants, attorneys,
and economists, to assist with reviewing applications under the Major Oil
Pipeline Siting Act.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 13.
November 23, 2011